Wyoming, session 2025, SF0197.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-227 is created to read:

9-4-227. Wyoming generational investment account.

SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783
(a) There is created the Wyoming generational
investment account. The account shall consist of all funds
transferred or appropriated to the account by law. All
monies deposited or transferred into the account are
inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust
fund, subject to the provisions for the withdrawal of funds
provided by this section.

(b) The state treasurer shall invest all funds within
the Wyoming generational investment account in accordance
with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and 9-4-716. W.S.
9-4-716(e) shall not apply to the account. The state
treasurer, or the treasurer's designee, which shall be
registered under the federal Investment Advisor's Act of
1940, as amended and if required to be registered by the
terms of that act, may invest the unobligated, unencumbered
balance of the account in equities, including stocks of
corporations. The account shall be invested so that the
overall risk profile of the account's investments shall not
materially exceed the risk profile of a reference portfolio
that consists of eighty-five percent (85%) private equity
and fifteen percent (15%) private credit investments. In
adopting investment policy statements for the account, the
SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783
board shall seek to preserve the balance of the account in
a manner that strives for the highest possible
risk-adjusted total net return consistent with an
appropriate level of safety and liquidity, giving
consideration to the account's potential extended
investment period and the extended period during which
monies in the account may be ineligible for withdrawal.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2025 and annually on each
July 1 thereafter until July 1, 2055, the state auditor
shall transfer one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from
the legislative stabilization reserve account to the
Wyoming generational investment account. The transfer under
this subsection shall occur after all other transfers and
appropriations from the legislative stabilization reserve
account required by law are made.

(d) Transfers made under subsection (c) of this
section, and the investment of those transfers, shall be in
accordance with all of the following:

SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783
(i) The state treasurer shall separately account
for each annual transfer made under subsection (c) of this
section and shall separately account for all earnings from
each annual transfer;

(ii) Annual transfers shall not be withdrawn
from the account;

(iii) Investment earnings from each annual
transfer shall not be withdrawn except in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section.

(e) On July 1 of the fiscal year after thirty (30)
fiscal years after the first deposit to the Wyoming
generational investment account, thirty-seven and one-half
percent (37.5%) of all investment earnings in the Wyoming
generational investment account arising from the annual
transfer to the account made thirty (30) fiscal years
earlier shall be deposited in the general fund. All
remaining investment earnings shall remain in the Wyoming
generational investment account for continued investment in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section. For
purposes of this subsection:
SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783

(i) "Investment earnings" mean all realized
investment earnings, including interest income, dividends,
realized capital gains and returned capital;

(ii) Investment earnings shall be distributed
under this subsection thirty (30) years after the initial
contribution and thirty (30) years following each of the
respective subsequent contributions;

(iii) The state treasurer may liquidate or sell
investments according to the fiduciary obligations
associated with the investments.

(f) Not later than November 1 of each year, the state
treasurer shall report to the joint appropriations
committee and the select committee on capital financing and
investments regarding the investment of funds in the
Wyoming generational investment account. The report shall
include information on the annual review of the account's
investment policy statement and an estimate of investment
earnings available for deposit to the general fund at the
next following date of a distribution from the account.
SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-203(a)(xiii) and 9-4-716(e) are
amended to read:

9-4-203. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-202 through
9-4-226 9-4-227.

9-4-716. State investment policy; investment
consultant.

(e) In investing monies of a fund or account which
may be invested in stock of a corporation or other
equities, the overall risk profile of the investments,
excluding any specific public purpose investment authorized
or directed by the legislature, shall not materially exceed
the risk profile of a reference portfolio that consists of
seventy percent (70%) global equities and thirty percent
(30%) domestic fixed income investments. The state
treasurer after consultation with the investment funds
SF0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0783
committee shall submit to the board the committee's
recommendations of specific benchmarks for the measurement
of the portfolio risk characteristics. The specific
benchmarks shall be determined by the board. Any provision
of law which restricts or expands the investment of a
specific fund or account to a greater degree than the
provisions of this subsection shall control over this
subsection.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0197